Utah statutes.
78A-11-107.   Referral of attorney misconduct.
If the commission, during the course of its investigation into an allegation
of judicial misconduct, receives information upon which a reasonable person
might conclude that a member of the state bar has violated one of the Rules of
Professional Conduct, the commission shall refer that information about the
attorney to the Office of Professional Conduct of the Utah State Bar.
